Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Boom Companies [Repealed]

43-28-201 — 43-28-204. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 43-28-201 — 43-28-204 (Acts 1885, ch. 119, § 2; Shan., §§ 2108-2111; Code 1932, §§ 3775-3778; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 68-201 — 68-204), concerning boom companies, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 179, § 1.